Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2734.11
Income tax; corporate taxpayer; when deemed taxable in another state.

(1) A corporate taxpayer is taxable in another state if that state has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a net income tax regardless of whether, in fact, the state does or does not do so.

(2) The failure to provide upon request of the Tax Commissioner a copy of the return filed and proof of payment of a net income tax imposed by another state creates a rebuttable presumption that the taxpayer is not subject to tax in the other state.

Laws 1984, LB 1124, § 14.